California, session 20252026, AB720.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 23320 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:23320. (a) An applicant for a new permanent license, which shall not include duplicate licenses, except as provided in paragraph (4), shall accompany the application with the application fee as specified in this division:(1) The license application fee for a new permanent license shall be nine hundred five dollars ($905), except as otherwise specified.(2) Applicants for a new permanent license of the following types shall accompany the application with a fee of fifteen thousand eight hundred thirty-five dollars ($15,835):(A) Off-sale general (Type 21).(B) On-sale general - eating place (Type 47), on-sale general public premises (Type 48), special on-sale general (Type 57), special on-sale general for-profit theater (Type 71 and Type 72), brewpub-restaurant (Type 75), caterer’s (Type 83), neighborhood restricted special on-sale (Type 87), special on-sale general license for historic cemetery (Type 88), music venue license (Type 90), and special use (Type 99).(3) Applicants for a new permanent license of the following types shall accompany the application with a fee as indicated:(A) Twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) for a wine, food, and art cultural museum (Type 78).(B) Six thousand dollars ($6,000) for an on-sale general - eating place on public property (Type 47), for an on-sale general restrictive service (Type 70), and for a music venue on public property (Type 90).(C) Two thousand dollars ($2,000) for an on-sale general dockside (Type 62).(D) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a special on-sale general theater (Type 64).(E) One hundred dollars ($100) for an out-of-state beer manufacturer certificate (Type 26), for a distilled spirits shipper certificate (Type 28), and for a direct shipper permit (Type 82).(F) One hundred dollars ($100) for a still (Type 6).(4) Applicants for a Duplicate Type 02 license shall accompany the application with a fee of four hundred forty dollars ($440).(b) The following are the types of licenses and the annual fees to be charged therefor:(1) (A) For a Type 01 - Beer manufacturer that produces more than 60,000 barrels per year: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one thousand five hundred thirty-one dollars ($1,531) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand eight hundred ninety dollars ($1,890).(B) For a Duplicate Type 01: the fee through September 30, 2019, is ninety-eight dollars ($98) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(2) (A) For a Type 02 - Winegrower (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 5,000 gallons or less: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-one dollars ($71) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(B) For a Type 02 - Winegrower (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 5,000 - 20,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred thirty-two dollars ($132) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(C) For a Type 02 - Winegrower (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 20,000 - 100,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred thirty-nine dollars ($239) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325).(D) For a Type 02 - Winegrower (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 100,000 - 200,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred fourteen dollars ($314) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(E) For a Type 02 - Winegrower (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 200,000 - 1,000,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred sixty-six dollars ($466) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Type 02 - Winegrower (to be computed only on the gallons produced); for each additional 1,000,000 gallons over 1,000,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred thirteen dollars ($313) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(G) For a Duplicate Type 02: the fee through September 30, 2019, is ninety-eight dollars ($98) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(3) (A) For a Type 03 - Brandy manufacturer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred eleven dollars ($311) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(B) For a Duplicate Type 03: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred eighty-four dollars ($284) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(4) For a Type 04 - Distilled spirits manufacturer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(5) For a Type 05 - Distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(6) For a Type 06 - Still: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(7) For a Type 07 - Rectifier: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(8) For a Type 08 - Wine rectifier: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(9) For a Type 09 - Beer and wine importer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(10) For a Type 10 - Beer and wine importer’s general license: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred forty dollars ($340) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(11) For a Type 11 - Brandy importer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(12) For a Type 12 - Distilled spirits importer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(13) For a Type 13 - Distilled spirits importer’s general license: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(14) (A) For a Type 14 - Public warehouse: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(B) For a Duplicate Type 14: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one dollar ($1) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is twenty-five dollars ($25).(15) For a Type 15 - Customs broker: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(16) For a Type 16 - Wine broker: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred three dollars ($103) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(17) For a Type 17 - Beer and wine wholesaler: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred forty dollars ($340) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(18) For a Type 18 - Distilled spirits wholesaler: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(19) For a Type 19 - Industrial alcohol dealer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred three dollars ($103) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(20) For a Type 20 - Off-sale beer and wine: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred seventy-eight dollars ($278) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(21) For a Type 21 - Off-sale general: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred seventeen dollars ($617) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(22) (A) For a Type 22 - Wine blender (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 5,000 gallons or less: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-one dollars ($71) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(B) For a Type 22 - Wine blender (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 5,000 - 20,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred thirty-two dollars ($132) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(C) For a Type 22 - Wine blender (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 20,000 gallons - 100,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred thirty-nine dollars ($239) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325).(D) For a Type 22 - Wine blender (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 100,000 - 200,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred fourteen dollars ($314) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(E) For a Type 22 - Wine blender (to be computed only on the gallons produced); 200,000 - 1,000,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred sixty-six dollars ($466) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Type 22 - Wine blender (to be computed only on the gallons produced); for each additional 1,000,000 gallons over 1,000,000 gallons: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred thirteen dollars ($313) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(23) (A) For a Type 23 - Small beer manufacturer that produces 60,000 barrels or less a year: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred eighty-four dollars ($184) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(B) For a Duplicate Type 23: the fee through September 30, 2019, is ninety-eight dollars ($98) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifteen dollars ($215).(24) For a Type 24 - Distilled spirits rectifier’s general license: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(25) For a Type 25 - California brandy wholesaler: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(26) For a Type 26 - Out-of-state beer manufacturer certificate: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-nine dollars ($79) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(27) For a Type 27 - California winegrower’s agent: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred ninety-five dollars ($595).(28) For a Type 28 - Out-of-state distilled spirits shipper certificate: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-nine dollars ($79) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(29) For a Type 29 - Winegrape grower storage: the fee through September 30, 2019, is ninety dollars ($90) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(30) For a Type 40 - On-sale beer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred eighty-four dollars ($284) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(31) For a Type 41 - On-sale beer and wine eating place: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred eighty-four dollars ($384) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(32) For a Type 42 - On-sale beer and wine pub premises: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred eighty-four dollars ($284) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(33) For a Type 43 - On-sale beer and wine train: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred fourteen dollars ($114) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(34) For a Type 44 - On-sale beer and wine fishing party boat: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred fourteen dollars ($114) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(35) For a Type 45 - On-sale beer and wine boat: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred fourteen dollars ($114) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(36) For a Type 46 - On-sale beer and wine airplane: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred fourteen dollars ($114) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(37) (A) For a Type 47 - On-sale general eating place in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 47 - On-sale general eating place in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 47 - On-sale general eating place in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 47 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 47 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 47 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(38) (A) For a Type 48 - On-sale general public premises in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 48 - On-sale general public premises in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 48 - On-sale general public premises in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 48 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 48 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 48 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(39) (A) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in cities of 40,000 population or over per three months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred forty-seven dollars ($247) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325).(B) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in cities of 40,000 population or over per six months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred ninety-four dollars ($494) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(C) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in cities of 40,000 population or over per nine months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred forty-one dollars ($741) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(D) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population per three months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred seventy-six dollars ($176) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifteen dollars ($215).(E) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population per six months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(F) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population per nine months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred twenty-six dollars ($526) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(G) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in all other localities per three months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred fifty-three dollars ($153) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(H) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in all other localities per six months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred six dollars ($306) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(I) For a Type 49 - On-sale general - seasonal business in all other localities per nine months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred fifty-eight dollars ($458) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(J) For a Duplicate Type 49 in cities of 40,000 population or over per three months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred seventy-six dollars ($176) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifteen dollars ($215).(K) For a Duplicate Type 49 in cities of 40,000 population or over per six months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(L) For a Duplicate Type 49 in cities of 40,000 population or over per nine months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred twenty-six dollars ($526) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(M) For a Duplicate Type 49 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population or over per three months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred three dollars ($103) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).(N) For a Duplicate Type 49 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 per six months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred seven dollars ($207) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(O) For a Duplicate Type 49 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population or over per nine months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred eleven dollars ($311) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375).(P) For a Duplicate Type 49 in all other localities per three months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is eighty-one dollars ($81) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(Q) For a Duplicate Type 49 in all other localities per six months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred sixty-six dollars ($166) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifteen dollars ($215).(R) For a Duplicate Type 49 in all other localities per nine months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred forty-seven dollars ($247) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325).(40) (A) For a Type 50 - On-sale general license for bona fide clubs in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred sixty dollars ($560) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(B) For a Type 50 - On-sale general license for bona fide clubs in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred twenty dollars ($420) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(C) For a Type 50 - On-sale general license for bona fide clubs in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred seventy-three dollars ($373) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(41) (A) For a Type 51 - Club license (issued under Article 4 of this chapter) in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred sixty dollars ($560) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(B) For a Type 51 - Club license (issued under Article 4 of this chapter) in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred twenty dollars ($420) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(C) For a Type 51 - Club license (issued under Article 4 of this chapter) in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred seventy-three dollars ($373) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(42) (A) For a Type 52 - Veterans’ club license (issued under Article 5 of this chapter) in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred sixty dollars ($560) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(B) For a Type 52 - Veterans’ club license (issued under Article 5 of this chapter) in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred twenty dollars ($420) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(C) For a Type 52 - Veterans’ club license (issued under Article 5 of this chapter) in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred seventy-three dollars ($373) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(43) (A) For a Type 53 - On-sale general train: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred seventeen dollars ($217) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325).(B) For a Duplicate Type 53: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(44) For a Type 54 - On-sale general boat: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred sixty-three dollars ($563) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(45) (A) For a Type 55 - On-sale general license for airplanes: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred sixty-three dollars ($563) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(B) For a Duplicate Type 55 for air common carriers: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(46) (A) For a Type 56 - On-sale general license for vessels of more than 1,000 tons burden: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred seventeen dollars ($217) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325).(B) For a Duplicate Type 56: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(47) (A) For a Type 57 - Special on-sale general in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 57 - Special on-sale general in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 57 - Special on-sale general in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 57 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 57 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 57 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(48) (A) For a Type 58 - Caterer’s permit; on-sale general or on-sale beer and wine: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred forty-six dollars ($146) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifteen dollars ($215).(B) For a Type 58 - Caterer’s permit; club in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(C) For a Type 58 - Caterer’s permit; club in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(D) For a Type 58 - Caterer’s permit; club in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(49) (A) For a Type 59 - On-sale beer and wine seasonal; operating period three to nine months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred thirty-nine dollars ($239) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(B) For a Type 59 - On-sale beer and wine seasonal; operating period three to six months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred sixty-two dollars ($162) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175).(50) (A) For a Type 60 - On-sale beer seasonal; operating period three to nine months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred thirty-nine dollars ($239) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(B) For a Type 60 - On-sale beer seasonal; operating period three to six months: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred sixty-two dollars ($162) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175).(51) For a Type 61 - On-sale beer public premises: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred eighty-four dollars ($284) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(52) For a Type 62 - On-sale general license dockside: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred nine dollars ($609) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(53) For a Type 63 - On-sale special beer and wine hospital: the fee through September 30, 2019, is ninety-six dollars ($96) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(54) (A) For a Type 64 - Special on-sale general theater in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred sixty dollars ($560) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(B) For a Type 64 - Special on-sale general theater in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred twenty dollars ($420) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(C) For a Type 64 - Special on-sale general theater in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred seventy-three dollars ($373) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(55) For a Type 65 - Special on-sale beer and wine symphony: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred eighty-four dollars ($284) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(56) For a Type 66 - Controlled access cabinet: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred seventeen dollars ($617) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(57) For a Type 67 - Bed and breakfast inn; per room: the fee through September 30, 2019, is eight dollars ($8) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is ten dollars ($10).(58) (A) For a Type 68 - Portable bar in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(B) For a Type 68 - Portable bar in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(C) For a Type 68 - Portable bar in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(59) For a Type 69 - Special on-sale beer and wine theater: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred eighty-four dollars ($284) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(60) (A) For a Type 70 - On-sale general restrictive service in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 70 - On-sale general restrictive service in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 70 - On-sale general restrictive service in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(61) (A) For a Type 71 - Special on-sale general for-profit theater in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 71 - Special on-sale general for-profit theater in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 71 - Special on-sale general for-profit theater in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 71 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 71 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 71 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(62) (A) For a Type 72 - Special on-sale general for-profit theater, Napa County in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 72 - Special on-sale general for-profit theater, Napa County in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 72 - Special on-sale general for-profit theater, Napa County in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 72 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 72 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 72 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(63) For a Type 73 - Special nonprofit sales: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred fourteen dollars ($114) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred sixty dollars ($160).(64) For a Type 74 - Craft distilled spirits manufacturer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is five hundred ten dollars ($510) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(65) (A) For a Type 75 - Brewpub-restaurant in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 75 - Brewpub-restaurant in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 75 - Brewpub-restaurant in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 75 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 75 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 75 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(66) (A) For a Type 76 - On-sale general maritime museum: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred seventeen dollars ($217) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325).(B) For a Duplicate Type 76: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventy-seven dollars ($77) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(67) For a Type 77 - Event permit: the fee through September 30, 2019, is one hundred forty-six dollars ($146) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is two hundred fifteen dollars ($215).(68) (A) For a Type 78 - On-sale general wine, food, and art cultural museum in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 78 - On-sale general wine, food, and art cultural museum in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 78 - On-sale general wine, food, and art cultural museum in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 78 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 78 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 78 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(69) For a Type 79 - Certified farmers’ market: the fee through September 30, 2019, is fifty-eight dollars ($58) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(70) For a Type 80 - Special on-sale general; per room: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventeen dollars ($17) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is twenty dollars ($20).(71) For a Type 81 - Wine sales event permit: the fee through September 30, 2019, is fifty dollars ($50) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(72) For a Type 82 - Direct shipper permit: the fee through September 30, 2019, is ten dollars ($10) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is twenty-five dollars ($25).(73) (A) For a Type 83 - On-sale general caterer’s permit in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 83 - On-sale general caterer’s permit in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 83 - On-sale general caterer’s permit in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(74) For a Type 84 - Certified farmers’ market beer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is fifty-eight dollars ($58) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).(75) For a Type 85 - Limited off-sale wine license: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred seventy-eight dollars ($278) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(76) For a Type 86 - Instructional tasting license: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred dollars ($300) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).(77) (A) For a Type 87 - Neighborhood restricted special on-sale in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 87 - Neighborhood restricted special on-sale in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 87 - Neighborhood restricted special on-sale in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 87 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 87 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 87 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(78) (A) For a Type 88 - Special on-sale general license for historic cemetery in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(B) For a Type 88 - Special on-sale general license for historic cemetery in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(C) For a Type 88 - Special on-sale general license for historic cemetery in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(D) For a Duplicate Type 88 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(E) For a Duplicate Type 88 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).(F) For a Duplicate Type 88 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(79) For a Type 90 - Music venue license in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(80) For a Type 90 - Music venue license in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).(81) For a Type 90 - Music venue license in all other localities: the fee is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).(82) For a Type 91 - Beer caterer’s permit: the fee is two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275).(83) For a Type 93 - Estate tasting event permit: the fee is two hundred dollars ($200).(c) (1) In addition to the application fee for a new permanent license as specified in subdivision (a), an annual renewal fee, as set forth in subdivision (b), shall accompany the application. The application fee shall be nonrefundable up to the amount of the application fee in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), as adjusted by subdivisions (d) and (e). The annual fee provided at the time of application shall allow the license to be active for one year from the date of issuance and shall be refundable only in the event that the license application is withdrawn or denied.(2) If an application includes multiple new permanent licenses to be issued at the same premises, the application fee shall be required for only one of the applied-for licenses and an application fee shall not be charged for the remainder of the licenses. In situations involving different license types, the application fee to be paid shall be the highest such fee as specified in subdivision (a). If an application for a new permanent license is combined with an application for license transfer pursuant to Section 24072 at the same premises, only the transfer application fee or the new permanent license application fee shall be required, whichever is highest. Notwithstanding this provision, the annual renewal fee required pursuant to this subdivision shall be payable for each license.(d) Beginning January 1, 2021, and each January 1 thereafter, the department may adjust each of the fees specified in this section by increasing each fee by an amount not to exceed the percentage that the California Consumer Price Index (California Department of Industrial Relations, Division of Labor Statistics and Research, All Items, Base Period 1982–84=100) for the preceding August 2019, and each August annually thereafter, has increased under the same index over the month of August 2018, which shall be the base period. The department shall not adjust fees pursuant to this section if the balance of the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund at the end of the prior fiscal year is greater than one-fourth of the department’s appropriation from the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund for the current fiscal year. No fee shall be decreased pursuant to this adjustment below the fee currently in effect on each December 31. If the accumulation of percentage increases is greater than 8 percent, the department shall not adjust fees without the Legislature’s approval through the budget process. In the event that this index is discontinued, the department shall consult with the Department of Finance to convert the increase calculations to an index then available. When approved by the Department of Finance, the new index shall replace the discontinued index.(e) When fees are adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d), the department shall calculate the percentage increase as specified in that subdivision and shall apply this increase to each fee. The increase to each fee shall be rounded to the nearest whole five dollars ($5). The adjusted fee list, to be effective on January 1 of the upcoming year, shall be published by the department on its internet website and transmitted in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than January 10 of the year before it becomes effective. This adjustment of fees and publication of the adjusted fee list is not subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 2. Section 23390 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:23390. (a) A licensed winegrower or brandy manufacturer, in addition to exercising all the privileges of their license at their licensed premises, may exercise all the license privileges at or from branch offices or warehouses, or United States bonded wine cellars located away from the place of production or manufacture, other than the following privileges:(1) Production or manufacture. For purposes of this paragraph, “production or manufacture” does not include mere storage of wine or topping of wine barrels, provided that the licensee complies with all federal and state laws regarding those activities, including, but not limited to, recordkeeping requirements.(2) The sale of wine or brandy to consumers for consumption on the premises in a bona fide eating place.(b) The department may issue to a winegrower or brandy manufacturer a duplicate of the original license for a location or locations other than the wine production or brandy manufacture premises. The duplicate license authorizes the maintenance and operation of each branch or warehouse or United States bonded wine cellar declared and designated by the winegrower or brandy manufacturer at the location for which the duplicate license is issued.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may allow any person that held more than one original winegrower’s license, on or before January 1, 1981, to transfer any duplicate license which has been issued, on or before January 1, 1981, on any of the original winegrower’s licenses to any other original winegrower’s license held by that person, on or before January 1, 1981, provided that the licensee cancels the original winegrower’s license from which any duplicate license is transferred. This subdivision shall not authorize any person to acquire any additional duplicate licenses other than those held by that licensee on or before January 1, 1981.(d) Notwithstanding Section 25607, if a winegrower’s license and a brandy manufacturer’s license are held under identical ownership at the same premises, where one of the licenses is a master license and the other license is a branch license, the licensee may store, age, conduct tastings pursuant to Section 23363.3, and engage in sales to consumers for consumption off the premises.SEC. 3. Section 23399.03 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:23399.03. (a) A winegrower licensee may apply to the department for an estate tasting event permit. If approved by the department, the permit issued to the winegrower licensee shall authorize the winegrower to exercise its tasting room privileges for wine manufactured by or for the winegrower on both of the following:(1) Property adjacent to the licensed premises and owned by or under the control of the licensee.(2) A nonadjacent vineyard that is owned by or under control of the licensee.(b) Approval of the permit shall grant the licensee all of the same privileges allowed under their license for the duration of the estate tasting event.(c) For each tasting event, consent shall be first obtained by the licensee from the department in the form of an estate tasting event authorization from the department. The fee for each estate tasting event authorization shall be one hundred dollars ($100).(1) The department may approve an estate tasting event authorization in the same manner as it does for catering authorizations issued pursuant to Section 23399.(2) An estate tasting event authorization shall not be issued for more than 36 events per licensee in one calendar year.(d) The annual fee for an estate tasting event permit shall be the annual fee as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23320. The permit may be renewed annually at the same time as the licensee’s license. An estate tasting event permit shall be transferable as a part of the license.(e) At all approved events, the licensee may exercise only those privileges authorized by the licensee’s license and shall comply with all provisions of the act pertaining to the conduct of the winegrower license. A violation of those provisions may be grounds for suspension or revocation of the licensee’s license or permit, or both, as though the violation occurred on the licensed premises.(f) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.(g) An estate tasting event authorization does not relieve an applicant of review and approval by the appropriate local city, county, or city and county for any other permit necessary prior to the event but subsequent to approval by the department to host the event, including, but not limited to, a local requirement to obtain approval by the local fire marshal or local fire code official. If the local city, county, or city and county requires approval but does not grant it, the authorization granted by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) becomes void and is nonrefundable.(h) Nothing in this section is intended to alter, diminish, replace, or eliminate the authority of a county, city, or city and county from exercising land use regulatory authority by law to the extent the authority may restrict, but not eliminate, privileges afforded by this section.SEC. 4. Section 14561 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:14561. (a) A beverage manufacturer shall clearly indicate on all beverage containers sold or offered for sale by that beverage manufacturer in the state the message “CA Redemption Value,” “California Redemption Value,” “CA Cash Refund,” “California Cash Refund,” or “CA CRV,” by etching, embossing, or printing the beverage container or by securely affixing a clear and prominent stamp, label, or other device to the beverage container.(b) A refillable beverage container sold or offered for sale is exempt from this section. However, a beverage manufacturer or container manufacturer may place upon, or affix to, a refillable beverage container any message that the manufacturer determines to be appropriate relating to the refund value of the beverage container.(c) A person shall not offer to sell, or sell, to a consumer, a beverage container subject to subdivision (a) that has not been labeled pursuant to this section, except for a refillable beverage container that is exempt from labeling pursuant to subdivision (b).(d) The department may require that a beverage container intended for sale in the state be printed, embossed, stamped, labeled, or otherwise marked with a scan code, a quick response (QR) code, or a universal product code or similar machine-readable indicia, which shall be at least one-half inch in size, but may, at the discretion of the beverage manufacturer, be larger in size. If the beverage container is eligible to be labeled with a chasing arrows symbol in compliance with Section 42355.51, a chasing arrows symbol may be used inside the machine-readable label in lieu of the message “DEPOSIT” adjacent to or within the machine-readable indicia. For purposes of this subdivision, “chasing arrows symbol” means an equilateral triangle, formed by three arrows curved at their midpoints, depicting a clockwise path, with a short gap separating the apex of each arrow from the base of the adjacent arrow.(e) A beverage container labeled with the message specified in subdivision (a) shall have the minimum redemption payment established pursuant to Section 14560, which shall be paid by the distributor to the department pursuant to Section 14574.(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, all of the following shall apply:(A) A beverage container that is included within the scope of this division beginning on January 1, 2024, but that was not subject to this division before that date, shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of this section until July 1, 2026.(B) A beverage container that is included within the scope of this division beginning on January 1, 2024, but that was not subject to this division before that date, and that was filled and labeled before July 1, 2025, shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of this section.(C) A beverage container containing a beverage described in paragraph (7) or (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 14504 that is included within the scope of this division beginning on January 1, 2024, but that was not subject to this division before that date, and that was filled and labeled before July 1, 2024, shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of this section.(2) A beverage container described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1) shall be considered an “empty beverage container” for purposes of this division as of January 1, 2024.(g) Notwithstanding any other requirement in statute or regulation, including, but not limited to, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2200 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, wine and distilled spirit manufacturers licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code) shall not be required to provide samples of proposed labels or beverage containers to the department for approval before the sale or transfer of beverage containers in the state. The department shall provide the relevant labeling criteria to those wine and distilled spirit manufacturers, which the manufacturers shall use to self-certify compliance with that criteria on their registration materials submitted to the department under this division. A manufacturer may request assistance from the department in determining compliance with the labeling criteria.SEC. 5. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.